Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1691XC (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 232.102A, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Family interactions shall continue regardless of a 3 parentâs failure to comply with the requirements of a court 4 order or the department , provided there is no finding by 5 a court or the department that such interaction would be 6 detrimental to the child unless a court finds that substantial 7 evidence exists that the family interactions, whether 8 supervised or unsupervised, would cause an imminent risk to the 9 childâs life or health . 10